Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.120

Application for certification—Fee.

Applications for certification shall be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for certification provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee shall accompany the application.

[ 1998 c 243 s 12.]